Utah statutes.
10-3-715.   Municipal ordinances received in evidence.

Whenever municipal ordinances are printed in book, pamphlet or looseleaf form and purport to be published by the authority of the governing body, the book, pamphlet or looseleaf shall be prima facie evidence of the contents, passage, and legal publication of such ordinances, as of the dates mentioned in the book, pamphlet, or looseleaf in all courts and administrative proceedings.

